Louisiana, session 2026, HB109.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 27:625(G)(10) is hereby amended and reenacted and R.S.
27:625(G)(11) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§625. State tax; levy
* * *
G. After complying with the provisions of Subsection D of this Section, each
fiscal year the state treasurer shall credit the following amounts to the following
funds:
* * *
(10) Two and one-half percent of the monies collected pursuant to this
Section shall be credited to the Imported Seafood Safety Fund, as established by R.S.
40:5.10.1.
(11) Any remaining funds shall be available as state general funds.
Section 2. R.S. 40:5.10.1(A) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-765 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 109
§5.10.1. Imported Seafood Safety Fund
A. There is hereby created in the state treasury a special fund designated as
the Imported Seafood Safety Fund, referred to hereafter in this Section as the "fund".
After allocation of money to the Bond Security and Redemption Fund as provided
in Article VII, Section 9(B) of the Constitution of Louisiana, the treasurer shall
deposit in and credit to the fund monies collected pursuant to R.S. 40:31.35(C) and
two and one-half percent of the monies collected pursuant to R.S. 27:625. Monies
in the fund shall be invested in the same manner as monies in the state general fund.
Interest earned on investment of monies shall be deposited in and credited to the
fund. Unexpended and unencumbered monies in the fund shall remain in the fund.
* * *